Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB520.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8SOCIAL CARD GAMES AND TOURNAMENTSSection 801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Nonbanking card game." A card game where players play 123456789101112131415161718192021 against one another rather than against the house. Nonbanking card games may include any of the following:(1) Poker games.(2) Hearts.(3) Rummy.(4) Pinochle.(5) Bid Whist."Nonbanking card game tournament" or "tournament." A series of card games held by a licensed eligible organization during a consecutive period of time of not more than 24 hours and not held as part of any other games of chance."Pyramid or build-up." A card game in which a prize must be returned in order to play another game or to be eligible for another bigger prize, or a game in which the prize must be forfeited if a later game is lost."Social card game" or "card game." A nonbanking card game that is played by members at the licensed premises of an eligible organization.Section 802. Authorization to conduct social card games.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any provision of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or any regulation to the contrary, social card games may be played at the licensed premises of an eligible organization in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.(b) Conditions.--(1) Card games may only be played by and between members of the eligible organization.(2) No eligible organization or other person may have an interest, financial or otherwise, in the outcome of a card game.20250HB0520PN0513 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Only nonbanking card games may be played with members playing against each other.(4) Wagering shall be entirely at the discretion of each player.(5) The maximum prize or payout for a card game shall be limited to $100.(6) No eligible organization may charge a fee for play.(7) Not more than 10 members may play at a table in a card game.(8) Card games may only be played in a room set aside for those activities at the licensed premises of the eligible organization.(9) Not more than five gaming tables may be made available for the play of card games by the eligible organization.(10) No card games may be played between the hours of 1 a.m. and 1 p.m.(11) No eligible organization or other person may collect, obtain or charge a percentage of or collect or obtain a portion of a wager or winnings of a player in a card game, except that a player may collect the player's own winnings.(12) No eligible organization or other person may collect or obtain any money from, or charge or impose a fee upon, a person that either enables the person to play or results in or from the person playing a card game. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to preclude the collection of a membership fee by the eligible organization that is unrelated to participation in the play of a card game authorized under this chapter.20250HB0520PN0513 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) An eligible organization that allows the use of the organization's premises for the play of card games by the organization's members in accordance with this chapter shall submit a schedule of the proposed dates of the card games and any card game tournaments to the licensing authority.(c) Required postings.--An eligible organization that permits the play of card games at the organization's licensed premises shall prominently post the following in close proximity of card game tables in the room designated to play card games:(1) The wagering limits for each type of card game.(2) The rules of play.(3) Information on where a person can obtain help for problem gambling, including the telephone number for the Pennsylvania Compulsive Gambling Helpline.(d) Prohibitions.--(1) It shall be unlawful for an eligible organization to:(i) Obtain or collect any money or thing of value from the conduct of card games at a licensed premises.(ii) Knowingly permit a card game to be played in violation of this chapter.(iii) Fail to comply with the posting requirement in accordance with subsection (c).(iv) Engage in any act, practice or course of conduct that would constitute fraud or deceit upon a player in a card game.(v) Allow a person under 21 years of age to play a card game at the eligible organization's licensed premises.(vi) Knowingly allow a person to employ or attempt 20250HB0520PN0513 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to employ a device, scheme or artifice to cheat or defraud a player in a card game.(vii) Advertise a card game in violation of section 704.(2) A licensed organization that violates paragraph (1) shall be subject to the penalties imposed under section 702(d).(e) Applicability.--The requirements of sections 502 and 503 may not apply to social card games authorized under this chapter.Section 803. Authorization to conduct tournaments.(a) Compliance.--An eligible organization may conduct nonbanking card game tournaments. A tournament conducted by an eligible organization shall comply with all of the following:(1) Only nonbanking card games shall be played in the tournament.(2) Each card game shall be conducted in a fair and honest manner and may not be operated on a pyramid or build-up basis.(3) Each player in the tournament shall be given the same chance of winning the tournament. Second-chance entries or multiple entries shall be prohibited.(4) The eligible organization shall conduct the tournament and shall not contract with nor permit another person to conduct the tournament or a card game during the tournament.(5) Only the eligible organization may receive or have a fixed or contingent right to receive, directly or indirectly, any profit, remuneration or compensation from or related to a card game in the tournament, except an amount that a person 20250HB0520PN0513 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may win as a player on the same basis as the other players.(6) No eligible organization may hold more than five tournaments annually.(7) The tournament may not be conducted within seven calendar days of another tournament conducted by the eligible organization.(8) The eligible organization may hold only one tournament during a period of 24 consecutive hours, starting from the time the tournament begins.(9) At the conclusion of the tournament, the eligible organization shall announce the name of the winning player and the amount of winnings.(10) The eligible organization shall limit the number of tables used in the tournament to a maximum of five, with a maximum of 10 players at each table.(11) The tournament shall only be held in a room at the licensed premises designated by the eligible organization for the conduct of card games.(12) Players in the tournament shall be limited to the members of the eligible organization.(13) Players shall be at least 21 years of age.(14) The tournament may not provide a direct financial benefit to the eligible organization or other person, except winning players in the tournament.(15) The value of all prizes awarded for the tournament, except for a Texas Hold'em tournament, may not exceed $200.(16) If the tournament involves Texas Hold'em, all of the following shall apply:(i) The payment of an entry fee or other consideration for participating is prohibited.20250HB0520PN0513 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The value of all prizes awarded to an individual winner of the tournament or contest at a single table may not exceed $200 each day.(17) The eligible organization shall ensure that reasonable accommodations are made for players with disabilities.(b) Required postings.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the eligible organization shall prominently post the tournament rules on a sign in the tournament playing room at least 24 hours before the tournament begins. The sign shall be at least 30 inches by 30 inches, and the rules shall be easily readable. The sign shall include all of the following:(1) In permanent letters three inches high, the words "Tournament Rules."(2) Card game or games to be played in the tournament and the rules of each card game.(3) The prize for each card game and tournament.(4) How winners will be determined.(5) Any other tournament rules.(c) Prizes.--Cash or merchandise prizes may be awarded for a tournament subject to the following:(1) The eligible organization shall distribute the prizes awarded on the day the prizes are won.(2) Donated or merchandise prizes shall not be repurchased by the eligible organization.(3) Only prizes that can be won shall be displayed in the room where the tournament is held.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0520PN0513 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728